West Virginia, session 2026, HB4916.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: CHAPTER 11. TAXATION. ARTICLE 16. NONINTOXICATING BEER. §11-16-13. Barrel tax on nonintoxicating beer. [Repealed]. ARTICLE 17. TOBACCO PRODUCTS EXCISE TAX ACT. §11-17-1. Short title. [Repealed]. §11-17-2. Definitions. [Repealed]. §11-17-3. Levy of tax; ratio; dedication of proceeds. [Repealed]. §11-17-4. Effect of rate changes; tobacco products on hand or in inventory; report; discount. [Repealed]. §11-17-4a. No tobacco products tax by municipalities or other governmental subdivisions. [Repealed]. §11-17-4b. Levy of tax on e-cigarette liquid; definitions; rate; invoice; report; payment; authority of the Tax Commissioner to inspect and examine witnesses; presumption; bond. [Repealed]. §11-17-5. How tax paid; stamps; how affixed; violations. [Repealed]. §11-17-6. Sales of stamps by deputies; fees; reports of deputies. [Repealed]. §11-17-7. Form of stamps; custody; discounts; security for payments. [Repealed]. §11-17-9. Discounts. [Repealed]. §11-17-10. Refunds. [Repealed]. §11-17-11. Surety bonds required; release of surety; new bond. [Repealed]. §11-17-12. Reports required; due date; records to be kept; inspection of records and stocks; examination of witnesses, summons, etc. [Repealed]. §11-17-13. Preservation of rules. [Repealed]. §11-17-17. Enforcement powers. [Repealed]. §11-17-19. Penalty for failure to file report when no tax due. [Repealed]. §11-17-19a. Criminal penalties. [Repealed]. §11-17-19b. Certain tax-not-paid tobacco products declared contraband. [Repealed]. §11-17-19c. Magistrate courts have concurrent jurisdiction. [Repealed]. §11-17-20. Transportation of unstamped cigarettes or tax-not-paid tobacco products; forfeitures and sales of cigarettes and equipment. [Repealed]. §11-17-20a. Criminal penalty for unlawful transportation of tax-not-paid tobacco products. [Repealed]. §11-17-20b. Vending machines; presence of tax-not-paid tobacco products. [Repealed]. §11-17-21. Severability. [Repealed]. §11-17-22. General procedure and administration. [Repealed]. §11-17-23. Special study on impact of tax on tobacco products other than cigarettes. [Repealed]. CHAPTER 29. MISCELLANEOUS BOARDS AND OFFICERS. ARTICLE 22C. WEST VIRGINIA LOTTERY RACETRACK TABLE GAMES ACT. §29-22C-26. Tax on the privilege of holding a license to operate West Virginia Lottery table games. [Repealed]. CHAPTER 60. STATE CONTROL OF ALCOHOLIC LIQUORS. ARTICLE 3A. SALES BY RETAIL LIQUOR LICENSEES. §60-3A-21. Tax on purchases of liquor. [Repealed]. ARTICLE 8. SALE OF WINES. §60-8-4. Liter tax. [Repealed]. §60-8-24. Disposition of revenue. [Repealed].